Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5468.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-36-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-36 entitled "Motor Fuel
Tax" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-36-7. Monthly report of distributors — Payment of tax.
(a) State requirements. Every distributor shall, on or before the twentieth (20th) day of each
month, render a report to the tax administrator, upon forms to be obtained from the tax
administrator, of the amount (number of gallons) of fuels purchased, sold, or used by the distributor
within this state and the amount of fuels sold by the distributor without this state from fuels within
this state during the preceding calendar month, and, if required by the tax administrator as to
purchases, the name or names of the person or persons from whom purchased and the date and
amount of each purchase, and as to sales, the name or names of the person or persons to whom sold
and the amount of each sale, and shall pay at the same time to the administrator tax at the rate of
thirty-two cents ($0.32) per gallon on all taxable gallons of fuel sold or used in this state.
(b) Federal requirements. In the event the federal government requires a certain portion of
the gasoline tax to be dedicated for highway improvements, then the state controller is directed to
establish a restricted receipt account and deposit that portion of gasoline tax receipts which brings
the state into federal compliance.
Beginning July 1, 2015 2025, and every other year thereafter, the gasoline tax shall be
adjusted by the two (2) year percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban
Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics determined by

comparing the CPI-U as of September 30 of the prior calendar year (“measurement date”) with the
CPI-U as of September 30, twenty-four (24) months prior to said measurement date; said
adjustment shall be rounded to the nearest one cent ($.01) increment, provided that the total tax
shall not be less than provided for in section (a).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000589
========
LC000589 - Page 2 of 3